Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 22. Financing of Rural Economic Development
154.22-100.
Approved company’s ability to elect to reduce job assessment fee rate imposed prior to July 15, 1996.

If an approved company’s financing agreement in effect prior to July 15, 1996, stipulates that the approved company elects to impose a six percent (6%) job development assessment fee pursuant to KRS 154.22-070 as in effect prior to July 15, 1996, the approved company, subject to provisions of subsection (2) of this section, may elect to change the job development fee rate from six percent (6%) as prescribed in KRS 154.22-070 as in effect prior to July 15, 1996, to four percent (4%) as set forth in KRS 154.22-070.

An approved company may elect to reduce the job assessment fee rate as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section if the financing agreement respecting the approved company’s approved project is amended upon written approval of all parties thereto, and the approved company attests in writing to the satisfaction of the authority that the approved company has not entered into any other agreement by which the company has pledged the proceeds of a six percent (6%) job development assessment fee as partial or full payment of any debt or other obligation to any other party.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 337, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 539, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

154.22-102.
Application of statutes to companies that are approved and that enter into agreements by certain dates.

If the authority adopts a preliminary resolution designating an eligible company as an approved company and preliminarily approving the project of the eligible company as an economic development project prior to July 15, 2002, and the authority adopts a final resolution approving the eligible company as an approved company and the project of the eligible company as an economic development project, and the authority and the eligible company enter into a financing agreement no later than June 30, 2003, then the approved company thereafter shall be subject to KRS 154.22-010 to 154.22-100 as in effect prior to July 15, 2002.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 338, § 24, effective July 15, 2002.